Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 6 Accounting for Assets

29-3-60.
Annual filing of verified return; change of reporting period; production of documents; effect of failure to file return.

Each year, within 60 days of the anniversary date of qualification, every conservator shall file with the court a verified return consisting of a statement of the receipts and expenditures of the conservatorship during the year preceding the anniversary date of qualification, an updated inventory consisting of a statement of the assets and liabilities of the estate as of the anniversary date of qualification, an updated plan for managing, expending, and distributing the minor’s property, a note or memorandum of any other fact necessary to show the true condition of the estate, and a statement of the current amount of the bond. The conservator shall mail a copy of the return by first-class mail to the surety on the conservator’s bond and the minor’s guardian, if any. If the minor has no guardian or if the guardian and the conservator are the same person, the conservator shall mail a copy of the return by first-class mail to the minor.

Upon petition of the conservator or upon the court’s own motion, the court may change the reporting period from the year immediately preceding the anniversary date of qualification to the year immediately preceding a date ordered by the court. In lieu of changing the reporting date, the court is authorized to accept a return for filing even if the return does not cover the appropriate reporting period; however, such acceptance shall not change the reporting period established by either the anniversary date of qualification or a subsequent order of the court, unless the court also enters an order changing the reporting date.

The court shall carefully examine each return of a conservator and, upon petition of any interested person or upon the court’s own motion, may require the conservator to produce the original documents that support the return. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if no objection is filed within 30 days of the time the conservator’s return is filed, the court shall record the return within 60 days of its filing. The return shall be kept on file in the court. The recorded return shall be prima-facie evidence of its correctness. If there is an objection to the return or if the court on its own motion determines that the conservator may have wasted the property of the minor or failed in any manner to comply with applicable law, the court shall hold a hearing or take such other action as the court deems appropriate.

The court shall keep a docket of conservators liable to file returns. Upon the failure of any conservator to file any return within the time frame required by law, the court shall cite the conservator to appear and show reason for the delay. A conservator who fails to file an annual return as required by law shall forfeit all commissions and other compensation for the year within which no return is filed unless otherwise ordered by the court. A willful and continued failure to file a return shall be good cause for removal.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Administrator’s duty to file inventory, § 53-7-75 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

29-3-61.
Interim settlement of accounts; reporting and requirements of report; procedure for objecting.

At any time after the six-month period following qualification, but not more frequently than once every 24 months, a conservator may petition the court for an interim settlement of accounts. The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor upon the filing of the petition for interim settlement.

The petition for an interim settlement of accounts shall be accompanied by a report which shall set forth all of the information required by law in annual returns and, in addition thereto, shall show:

The period which the report covers;

The name and address of the minor, the name and address of the minor’s guardian, if any, and the name of the surety on the conservator’s bond, with the amount of the bond; and

Such other facts as the court may require.

The court, upon the petition for an interim settlement of accounts being filed, shall issue a citation and shall require any objections to be filed in accordance with Chapter 9 of this title. The minor and the guardian ad litem shall be served personally, and the minor’s guardian, if any, and the surety of the conservator’s bond shall be served by first-class mail.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

29-3-62.
Objections to conservator’s interim settlement of accounts; hearing.

Any interested person may file an objection to the conservator’s interim settlement of accounts. Upon receipt of objections or on the court’s own motion, the court shall hold a hearing in which it shall consider all objections, hear evidence, and determine whether the conservator shall be discharged from liability for the period covered by the interim settlement of accounts.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-63.
Judgment against conservator and surety.

If the court finds that the conservator is liable to the minor, the court shall enter a judgment against the conservator and any surety in the amount of such liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-3-64.
Termination of conservatorship.

The conservatorship of a minor shall terminate either on the date upon which the minor reaches 18 years of age or earlier if the minor becomes emancipated. Proof of emancipation shall be filed with the court; and, where the court deems appropriate, the court may order a hearing on the issue of termination.

Within six months prior to the date the minor reaches 18 years of age, the conservator or any other interested person may file a petition for the appointment of a conservator for the minor when that minor becomes an adult, in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, to take effect on the date the minor reaches 18 years of age.

The death of the minor automatically terminates the conservatorship, but the conservator or the conservator’s personal representative must comply with the provisions in Code Section 29-3-70.

Upon termination of the conservatorship, the conservator shall deliver any money or property to the former minor or, if a conservator has been appointed for the former minor, to that conservator, or, if the minor is deceased, to the minor’s personal representative.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-3-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.